Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1269
Conservation and peace officers; enforcement of act.

Every conservation officer and peace officer of this state and its subdivisions shall have the duty and authority to enforce the State Boat Act and in the exercise thereof shall have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to the act.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 69;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 400.